Massachusetts, session 194th, H966.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 118 of chapter 94 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting before the definition of “broker” the following definition: “'Bird', any winged
vertebrate, such as a duck or goose."
SECTION 2. Section 118 of Chapter 94 is further amended by inserting after the
definition of “department” the following definition: "'Force feeding', a process that causes a bird
to consume more food than a typical bird of the same species would consume voluntarily. These
methods include but are not limited to delivering feed through a tube or other device inserted into
the bird’s esophagus."
SECTION 3. Section 118 of Chapter 94 is further amended by striking the definition of
“Poultry” and replacing it with the following: “any domesticated bird, whether live or dead,
including a duck or goose.”
of 2

SECTION 4. Section 127 of Chapter 94, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting
after clause 3 of Subsection (a) the following clause: "(4) force feed a bird for the purpose of
enlarging the bird’s liver beyond the normal size or hire another person to do so."
SECTION 5. Section 127 of said chapter 94, as so appearing, is further amended by
inserting after clause 3 of Subsection (b) the following clause: "(4) any products that are the
result of force feeding a bird for the purpose of enlarging the bird’s liver beyond the normal
size."
of 2